Tennessee, session 114, HB0509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-209(d), is amended by deleting
the language "within thirty (30) days" and substituting "within sixty (60) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0509
002077
- 1 -